Wisconsin, session 2025, AB294.
do enact as follows:AB294,1Section 1. 15.405 (7g) of the statutes is amended to read:15.405 (7g) Board of nursing. There is created a board of nursing in the department of safety and professional services. The board of nursing shall consist of the following members appointed for staggered 4-year terms: 5 3 currently licensed registered nurses under ch. 441; one currently licensed practical nurse under ch. 441; one currently certified advanced practice nurse prescriber under ch. 441; one nurse educator; one member who is either a licensed registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse under ch. 441; and 2 public members. Each registered nurse member shall have graduated from a program in professional nursing and each practical nurse member shall have graduated from a program in practical nursing accredited by the state in which the program was conducted.AB294,1mSection 1m. 15.405 (7g) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), is amended to read:15.405 (7g) Board of nursing. There is created a board of nursing in the department of safety and professional services. The board of nursing shall consist of the following members appointed for staggered 4-year terms: 3 currently licensed registered nurses under ch. 441; one currently licensed practical nurse under ch. 441; one currently certified licensed advanced practice registered nurse prescriber under ch. 441; one nurse educator; one member who is either a licensed registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse under ch. 441; and 2 public members. Each registered nurse member shall have graduated from a program in professional nursing and each practical nurse member shall have graduated from a program in practical nursing accredited by the state in which the program was conducted.AB294,2Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.(1) Of the members of the board of nursing who were appointed as currently licensed registered nurses under ch. 441 pursuant to s. 15.405 (7g), the position of the 2 such members whose terms expire the earliest following the effective date of this subsection shall be replaced by a currently certified advanced practice nurse prescriber under ch. 441 and a nurse educator after their terms expire.AB294,3Section 3. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after publication, except as follows:(1) The treatment of s. 15.405 (7g) (by Section 1m) takes effect on September 1, 2026. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/ab294 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/ab294 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB294 enrolledbills/2025/REG/AB294 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»AB294: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting